Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska84-1212
Program for selection and preservation
of essential records; review, periodically.

The administrator
shall review periodically, and at least once each year, the program for the
selection and preservation of essential records, including the classification
thereof and the provisions for preservation duplicates and for the safeguarding
of essential records and preservation duplicates to insure that the purposes
of the Records Management Act are
accomplished.

Laws 1961, c. 455, § 12, p. 1392;

Laws 1969, c. 841, § 9, p. 3174;

Laws 1979, LB 559, § 6;

Laws 2012, LB719, § 18.